Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1597.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric utility” means a public utility, a people’s utility district organized under
ORS chapter 261, a municipal utility operating under ORS chapter 225 or a cooperative or-
ganized under ORS chapter 62 that provides or delivers electricity service.
(b) “Energy facility” means a nuclear energy facility located in Oregon that commences
generating electricity on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(2) An electric utility shall disclose to its customers the costs of storing nuclear waste
produced by an energy facility in generating electricity that the electric utility recovers in
the rates of the electric utility.
(3) Prior to developing the energy facility, a person who seeks to develop an energy fa-
cility to generate electricity that is to be sold by an electric utility shall disclose to the
electric utility and the public the costs of storing nuclear waste that will be produced by the
energy facility in generating electricity.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 260